Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4652.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; IGNITE BUSINESSWOMEN INVESTMENT GROUP FOUNDATION.new text end new text begin (a) $1,400,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to Ignite Businesswomen Investment Group Foundation (IBWIG Foundation) to establish a women entrepreneurs access to capital and business development fund. Money appropriated under this paragraph may be used to provide working capital, capacity-building grants, and low-interest loans. IBWIG Foundation must prioritize women entrepreneurs in underserved and economically disadvantaged communities to conduct the activities under this paragraph. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end new text begin (b) $250,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to IBWIG Foundation to provide capacity building and business development support for women entrepreneurs. Money appropriated under this paragraph must be used to provide: new text end new text begin (1) business planning, leadership development, financial literacy, technology training, and marketing support; and new text end new text begin (2) grants to community-based organizations specializing in women-focused entrepreneurship support. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end